Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1472
Obligation of good faith.

Every duty under the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act and every act which must be performed as a condition precedent to the exercise of a right or remedy under the act shall impose an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 23.